Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,160
Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund; created; use; investment; grants; restrictions.

(1) The Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund is created. The department shall deduct from the fund amounts sufficient to reimburse itself for its costs of administration of the fund. The fund shall be administered by the department. The fund shall consist of proceeds from the fees imposed pursuant to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act.

(2) The fund may be used for purposes which include, but are not limited to:

(a) Technical and financial assistance to political subdivisions for creation of recycling systems and for modification of present recycling systems;

(b) Recycling and waste reduction projects, including public education, planning, and technical assistance;

(c) Market development for recyclable materials separated by generators, including public education, planning, and technical assistance;

(d) Capital assistance for establishing private and public intermediate processing facilities for recyclable materials and facilities using recyclable materials in new products;

(e) Programs which develop and implement composting of yard waste and composting with sewage sludge;

(f) Technical assistance for waste reduction and waste exchange for waste generators;

(g) Programs to assist communities and counties to develop and implement household hazardous waste management programs;

(h) Capital assistance for establishing private and public facilities to manufacture combustible waste products and to incinerate combustible waste to generate and recover energy resources, except that no disbursements shall be made under this section for scrap tire processing related to tire-derived fuel;

(i) Grants for reimbursement of costs to cities of the first class, cities of the second class, villages, and counties of five thousand or fewer population for the deconstruction of abandoned buildings. Eligible deconstruction costs will be related to the recovery and processing of recyclable or reusable material from the abandoned buildings; and

(j) Administrative costs of the department in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 to implement, administer, and enforce the Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act.

(3) Grants up to one million five hundred thousand dollars annually shall be available until June 30, 2029, for new scrap tire projects only, if acceptable scrap tire project applications are received. Eligible categories of disbursement under section 81-15,161 may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Reimbursement for the purchase of crumb rubber generated and used in Nebraska, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent of the cost of the crumb rubber;

(b) Reimbursement for the purchase of tire-derived product which utilizes a minimum of twenty-five percent recycled tire content, with disbursements not to exceed twenty-five percent of the product's retail cost;

(c) Participation in the capital costs of building, equipment, and other capital improvement needs or startup costs for scrap tire processing or manufacturing of tire-derived product, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent of such costs or five hundred thousand dollars, whichever is less;

(d) Participation in the capital costs of building, equipment, or other startup costs needed to establish collection sites or to collect and transport scrap tires, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent of such costs;

(e) Cost-sharing for the manufacturing of tire-derived product, with disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually;

(f) Cost-sharing for the processing of scrap tires, with disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually;

(g) Cost-sharing for the use of scrap tires for civil engineering applications for specified projects, with disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually; and

(h) Disbursement to a political subdivision up to one hundred percent of costs incurred in cleaning up scrap tire collection and disposal sites.

The director shall give preference to projects which utilize scrap tires generated and used in Nebraska.

(4) Priority for grants made under section 81-15,161 shall be given to grant proposals demonstrating a formal public/private partnership except for grants awarded from fees collected under subsection (6) of section 13-2042.

(5) Grants awarded from fees collected under subsection (6) of section 13-2042 may be renewed for up to a five-year grant period. Such applications shall include an updated integrated solid waste management plan pursuant to section 13-2032. Annual disbursements are subject to available funds and the grantee meeting established grant conditions. Priority for such grants shall be given to grant proposals showing regional participation and programs which address the first integrated solid waste management hierarchy as stated in section 13-2018 which shall include toxicity reduction. Disbursements for any one year shall not exceed fifty percent of the total fees collected after rebates under subsection (6) of section 13-2042 during that year.

(6) Any person who stores waste tires in violation of section 13-2033, which storage is the subject of abatement or cleanup, shall be liable to the State of Nebraska for the reimbursement of expenses of such abatement or cleanup paid by the department.

(7) The department may receive gifts, bequests, and any other contributions for deposit in the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1990, LB 163, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 95;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 444, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 122;

Laws 1997, LB 495, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 592, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 16;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB568, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB180, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB379, § 1;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 78;

Laws 2013, LB549, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1101, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB1008, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 132;

Laws 2022, LB809, § 11;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 46;

Laws 2025, LB36, § 34;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 45.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Safe Battery Collection and Recycling Act, see section 81-15,314.